California, session 20252026, AB313.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69513.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:69513.2. Notwithstanding any other law:(a) The commission shall grant up to an additional 30 calendar days beyond an application deadline for any financial aid program administered by the commission pursuant to this part if the commission receives and approves a formal request to postpone the application deadline from either the superintendent of a school district or community college district or from the president or chancellor of a California institution of higher education that is eligible to receive state funds for student financial assistance and the commission finds that a qualifying event, as defined in subdivision (e), has occurred.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may grant up to an additional 30 calendar days beyond an application deadline for any financial aid program administered by the commission pursuant to this part if the commission finds that a qualifying event described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (e) has occurred.(c) A postponement of an application deadline granted by the commission pursuant to this section shall apply to all financial aid applicants within the school district, community college district, or the area or region, such as a city or county, that was predominantly affected by the qualifying event.(d) For purposes of this section, the commission may, on a permanent basis, delegate to the director of the commission the authority to grant a deadline postponement authorized by this section.(e) For purposes of this section, a “qualifying event” is any event or extenuating circumstance outside of the control of the pupils or students in an affected school district, community college district, or area or region that has had an adverse effect on the ability of students within the district to successfully complete and submit their financial aid applications by an established statutory deadline. The qualifying event shall have occurred or been ongoing during the period for which financial aid applications were available to submit for the following academic year, and includes, but is not limited to, any of the following types of events:(1) A natural disaster.(2) A state of emergency declared by the Governor or the President of the United States.(3) A delay in the opening of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, as declared by the commission.(4) A labor action.(f) The commission may establish procedures, which may include a standardized application form, through which a postponement of an application deadline may be requested by the individuals referenced in subdivision (a). The formal application to the commission shall be submitted no later than 15 business days after the occurrence of the qualifying event in question, or, if the qualifying event is ongoing, no later than 15 business days after the conclusion of the qualifying event, and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) A description of the qualifying event that is the basis for the request, including how the event in question has had an adverse effect on students’ ability to submit their financial aid applications by the established deadline.(2) A list of any financial aid outreach events, including, but not limited to, workshops or webinars sponsored by the commission, that have been canceled or delayed due to the qualifying event.(3) When available, data showing that there has been, or is likely to be, a reduction in the number of students who have completed a financial aid application from the previous year.(g) If the commission grants the postponement of an application deadline pursuant to this section, the commission shall issue a written notice of the postponement of the deadline within 48 hours of granting the postponement of the deadline. The notice shall include the approved postponed deadline, and shall be sent to all of the following or their respective designees:(1) The individual who requested the extension pursuant to subdivision (a), if applicable.(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.(3) The Governor.(4) The Director of Finance.(5) The President of the University of California.(6) The Chancellor of the California State University.(7) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(8) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature.(h) When granting a postponement of an application deadline pursuant to this section, the commission shall post all of the following on its internet website:(1) The approved postponed deadline.(2) The public school district, community college district, or area or region, such as a city or county, to which the approved postponed deadline applies.(i) The authority to grant postponements of application deadlines established pursuant to this section shall apply to all of the following programs established in statute, and any other state-funded financial aid programs administered by the commission pursuant to this part:(1) The Cal Grant A Entitlement program established by Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) of Chapter 1.7.(2) The Cal Grant B Entitlement program established by Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) of Chapter 1.7.(3) The California Community College Transfer Cal Grant Entitlement Program established by Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436) of Chapter 1.7.(4) The Competitive Cal Grant A and B Awards program established by Article 5 (commencing with Section 69437) of Chapter 1.7.(5) The Middle Class Scholarship Program established by Article 22 (commencing with Section 70020).(j) Commission staff shall annually report all of the following information to the commission, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature:(1) The total number of deadline postponement requests that were granted pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) The total number of statewide financial aid applications received after the established application deadline.(3) The specific school districts, community college districts, or areas or regions within the state that received approval to submit a delayed financial aid application pursuant to subdivision (a).(4) Information regarding whether approved deadline postponements due to a natural disaster or state of emergency were made equally available to financial aid applicants across the impacted area or region.